Mississippi statutes. Title 63. Motor Vehicles and Traffic Regulations
Article 1. Driver’s License.
§ 63-1-67.
Renting motor vehicle to another.

No person shall rent a motor vehicle to any other person unless the latter person is then duly licensed under the provisions of this article, or, in the case of a nonresident, then duly licensed under the laws of the state or country of his residence except a nonresident whose home state or country does not require that an operator be licensed.

No person shall rent a motor vehicle to another until he has inspected the license of the person to whom the vehicle is to be rented and compared and verified the signature thereon with the signature of such person written in his presence.

Every person renting a motor vehicle to another shall keep a record of the registration number of the motor vehicle so rented, the name and address of the person to whom the vehicle is rented, the number of the license of said latter person and the date and place when and where said license was issued. Such record shall be open to inspection by any police officer or officers or employee of the commissioner.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8113; Laws, 1938, ch. 143; Laws, 1985, ch. 376, § 24, eff from and after July 1, 1985.

§ 63-1-69.
Punishment for violations where no specific penalty provided.

Any person convicted of a violation of this article or any provisions of said article for which no other penalty is provided shall be punished by a fine of not less than five dollars ($5.00) and costs and not more than two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00) and costs, or by imprisonment in the county jail for a period of from one to six months, or by both the fine and imprisonment at the discretion of the court.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8117; Laws, 1938, ch. 143.

§ 63-1-71.
Revocation or suspension of driving privilege of person convicted of violation of Uniform Controlled Substance Law or violation of similar law of another jurisdiction; reduction of suspension in hardship cases.

[Effective from and after October 15, 2019, this section will read as follows:]

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 63-11-30(3) and in addition to any penalty authorized by the Uniform Controlled Substances Law or any other statute indicating the dispositions that can be ordered for an adjudication of delinquency, every person convicted of driving under the influence of a controlled substance, or entering a plea of nolo contendere thereto, or adjudicated delinquent therefor, in a court of this state, the United States, another state, a territory or possession of the United States, the District of Columbia or the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, shall forthwith forfeit his right to operate a motor vehicle over the highways of this state for a period of not less than six (6) months. In the case of any person who at the time of the imposition of sentence does not have a driver’s license or is less than sixteen (16) years of age, the period of the suspension of driving privileges authorized herein shall commence on the day the sentence is imposed and shall run for a period of not less than six (6) months after the day the person obtains a driver’s license or reaches the age of sixteen (16). If the driving privilege of any person is under revocation or suspension at the time of any conviction or adjudication of delinquency for driving under the influence of a controlled substance, the revocation or suspension period imposed herein shall commence as of the date of termination of the existing revocation or suspension.

The court in this state before whom any person is convicted of or adjudicated delinquent for driving under the influence of a controlled substance shall collect forthwith the Mississippi driver’s license of the person and forward such license to the Department of Public Safety along with a report indicating the first and last day of the suspension or revocation period imposed pursuant to this section. If the court is for any reason unable to collect the license of the person, the court shall cause a report of the conviction or adjudication of delinquency to be filed with the Commissioner of Public Safety. That report shall include the complete name, address, date of birth, eye color and sex of the person and shall indicate the first and last day of the suspension or revocation period imposed by the court pursuant to this section. The court shall inform the person orally and in writing that if the person is convicted of personally operating a motor vehicle during the period of license suspension or revocation imposed pursuant to this section, the person shall, upon conviction, be subject to the penalties set forth in Section 63-11-40. A person shall be required to acknowledge receipt of the written notice in writing. Failure to receive a written notice or failure to acknowledge in writing the receipt of a written notice shall not be a defense to a subsequent charge of a violation of Section 63-11-40. If the person is the holder of a driver’s license from another jurisdiction, the court shall not collect the license but shall notify forthwith the Commissioner of Public Safety who shall notify the appropriate officials in the licensing jurisdiction. The court shall, however, in accordance with the provisions of this section, revoke the person’s nonresident driving privilege in this state.

The county court or circuit court having jurisdiction, on petition, may reduce the suspension of driving privileges under this section if the suspension would constitute a hardship on the offender. When the petition is filed, such person shall pay to the circuit clerk of the court where the petition is filed a fee of Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for each year, or portion thereof, of license revocation or suspension remaining under the original sentence, which shall be deposited into the State General Fund to the credit of a special fund hereby created in the State Treasury to be used for alcohol or drug abuse treatment and education, upon appropriation by the Legislature. This fee shall be in addition to any other court costs or fees required for the filing of petitions.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 468 § 1; Laws, 1993, ch 487, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1993; Laws, 2019, ch. 466, § 32, eff from and after October 15, 2019.

§ 63-1-73.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 2015, ch. 326, § 2, effective July 1, 2015.

§63-1-73. [Laws, 2009, ch. 488, § 5; Laws, 2011, ch. 481, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2011.]